California statutes. Penal Code
(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 780, Sec. 14.   (SB 746)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

33865.

(a) When the Department of Justice receives a completed application pursuant to Section 33850 accompanied by the fee required pursuant to Section 33860, it shall conduct an eligibility check of the applicant to determine whether the applicant is eligible to possess a firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition.

(b) The department shall have 30 days from the date of receipt to complete the background check, unless the background check is delayed by circumstances beyond the control of the department. The applicant may contact the department via the California Firearms Application Reporting System (CFARS) to inquire about the reason for a delay.

(c) If the department
 determines that the applicant is eligible to possess the firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition, the department shall provide the applicant with written notification that includes the following:

(1) The identity of the applicant.

(2) A statement that the applicant is eligible to possess a firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition.

(3) If applicable, a description of the firearm by make, model, and serial number, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted.

(d) The department shall enter a record of the firearm into the Automated Firearms System (AFS), provided, however, that if the firearm is not a
 handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS.

(e) If the department denies the application, and the firearm is an otherwise legal firearm, the department shall notify the applicant of the denial and provide a form for the applicant to use to sell or transfer the firearm to a licensed dealer.

(f) If the department denies the application, the applicant shall receive notification via CFARS from the department explaining the reason for the denial and information regarding the appeal process.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 780, Sec. 16.   (SB 746)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

33870.

(a) If a law enforcement agency determines that the applicant is the legal owner of any firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition deposited with the agency, that the applicant is prohibited from possessing any firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition, and that the firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition is otherwise legal, the applicant shall be entitled to sell or transfer the firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition to a licensed firearms dealer, or licensed ammunition vendor, as applicable. If a law enforcement agency determines that the applicant is prohibited from owning or possessing any firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition and the prohibition will expire on a specific ascertainable date, whether or not that date is specified in a court order, the
 applicant shall be entitled to have the firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition stored by a licensed firearms dealer or licensed ammunition vendor, as applicable, for the duration of the prohibition period pursuant to Section 29830.

(b) If the firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition has been lost or stolen, it shall be restored to the lawful owner pursuant to Section 11108.5 upon the owner’s identification of the property, proof of ownership, and proof of eligibility to possess a firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition pursuant to Section 33865.

(c) This section does not prevent the local law enforcement agency from charging the rightful owner of the property the fees described in Section 33880.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1,
 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 780, Sec. 18.   (SB 746)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

33875.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, no law enforcement agency or court shall be required to retain any firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition for more than 180 days after the owner has been notified by the court or law enforcement agency that the property has been made available for return. An unclaimed firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition may be disposed of after the 180-day period has expired.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 780, Sec. 20.   (SB 746)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

33880.

(a) A city, county, or city and county, or a state agency may adopt a regulation, ordinance, or resolution imposing a charge equal to its administrative costs relating to the seizure, impounding, storage, or release of any firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition.

(b) The fee under subdivision (a) shall not exceed the actual costs incurred for the expenses directly related to taking possession of any firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition, storing it, and surrendering possession of it to a licensed firearms dealer or to the owner.

(c) The administrative costs described in subdivisions (a) and (b) may be waived by the local or state agency upon verifiable
 proof that the firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition was reported stolen at the time it came into the custody or control of the law enforcement agency.

(d) The following apply to any charges imposed for administrative costs pursuant to this section:

(1) The charges shall only be imposed on the person claiming title to the firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition.

(2) Any charges shall be collected by the local or state authority only from the person claiming title to the firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition.

(3) The charges shall be in addition to any other charges authorized or imposed pursuant to this code.

(4) A charge shall not be imposed for a hearing
 or appeal relating to the removal, impound, storage, or release of any firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition, unless that hearing or appeal was requested in writing by the legal owner of the property. In addition, the charge may be imposed only upon the person requesting that hearing or appeal.

(e) Costs for a hearing or appeal related to the release of any firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition shall not be charged to the legal owner who redeems the property, unless the legal owner voluntarily requests the poststorage hearing or appeal. A city, county, city and county, or state agency shall not require a legal owner to request a poststorage hearing as a requirement for release of the firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition to the legal owner.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 780, Sec. 22.   (SB 746)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

33885.

(a) In a proceeding for the return of any firearm, ammunition feeding device, or ammunition seized and not returned pursuant to this chapter, where the defendant or cross-defendant is a law enforcement agency, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 780, Sec. 24.   (SB 746)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

33895.

(a) Section 27545 does not apply to deliveries, transfers, or returns of firearms made pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Sections 30312 and 30342 do not apply to deliveries or transfers of returns of ammunition or ammunition feeding devices by a court or law enforcement agency made pursuant to this chapter.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 780, Sec. 26.   (SB 746)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Firearms that are Unclaimed, Abandoned, or Subject to Destruction [34000. - 34010.]

34000.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law or of any local ordinance to the contrary, when any firearm is in the possession of any officer of the state, or of a county, city, or city and county, or of any campus of the University of California or the California State University, and the firearm is an exhibit filed in any criminal action or proceeding which is no longer needed or is unclaimed or abandoned property, which has been in the possession of the officer for at least 180 days, the firearm shall be destroyed as provided for in Sections 18000 and 18005.

(b) This section does not apply to any firearm in the possession of the Department of Fish and Wildlife, or which was used in the
 violation of any provision in the Fish and Game Code, or any regulation under that code.

(c) This section does not apply to a firearm described in subdivision (b) of Section 18005 in the possession of a public administrator, public guardian, or public conservator in the performance of their duties as the personal representative of a decedent’s estate, or in the performance of the duties of a conservator or guardian over a person or their estate, in order to fulfill their obligations under state law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 547, Sec. 2.   (SB 1019)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

34005.

(a) (1) An officer having custody of any firearm that may be useful to the California National Guard, the Coast Guard Auxiliary, or to any military or naval agency of the federal or state government, including, but not limited to, the California State Military Museum and Resource Center, located in Sacramento, and at branch museums located at the California National Guard facilities at Camp Roberts, Camp San Luis Obispo, and Los Alamitos Armed Forces Reserve Center, may, upon the authority of the legislative body of the city, city and county, or county by which the officer is employed and the approval of the Adjutant General, deliver the firearm to
 the commanding officer of a unit of the California National Guard, the Coast Guard Auxiliary, or any other military agency of the state or federal government, in lieu of destruction as required by any of the provisions listed in Section 16580.

(2) Any state agency, county, municipality, or special purpose district may offer any excess military weapons or equipment, such as historical war equipment like artillery, tanks, or armored vehicles, to the California State Military Museum and Resource Center or any branch museum described in paragraph (1).

(3) The officer delivering a firearm pursuant to this subdivision shall take a receipt for it, which contains a complete description of the firearm, and shall keep the receipt on file in his or her office as a public record.

(b) Any law enforcement agency that has custody of any firearms, or any parts of any firearms, which are subject to destruction as required by any of the provisions listed in Section 16580, may, in lieu of destroying the weapons, retain and use any of them as may be useful in carrying out the official duties of the agency. Alternatively, upon approval of a court, the agency may do either of the following:

(1) Release the weapons to any other law enforcement agency for use in carrying out the official duties of that agency.

(2) Turn over to the criminalistics laboratory of the Department of Justice or the criminalistics laboratory of a police department, sheriff’s office, or district attorney’s office, any weapons that may be useful in carrying out the official duties of the respective agencies.

(c) (1) Any firearm, or part of any firearm, which, rather than being destroyed, is used for official purposes pursuant to this section, shall be destroyed by the agency using the weapon when it is no longer needed by the agency for use in carrying out its official duties.

(2) Firearms or weaponry donated to the California State Military Museum and Resource Center may be disposed of pursuant to Section 179 of the
 Military and Veterans Code.

(d) (1) Any law enforcement agency that has custody of any firearms, or any parts of any firearms, which are subject to destruction as required by any of the provisions listed in Section 16580, may, in lieu of destroying the firearms, obtain an order from the superior court directing the release of the firearms to the sheriff.

(2) The sheriff shall enter those weapons into the Automated Firearms System (AFS), via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System, with a complete description of each weapon, including the make, type, category, caliber, and serial number of the firearms, and the name of the academy receiving the weapon entered into the AFS miscellaneous field.

(3) The sheriff shall then release the firearms to the basic training academy certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, so that the firearms may be used for instructional purposes in the certified courses. All firearms released to an academy shall be under the care, custody, and control of the particular academy.

(4) Any firearm, or part of any firearm, which is not destroyed, and is used for the purposes authorized by this section, shall be returned to the law enforcement agency that had original custody of the firearm when it is no longer needed by the basic training academy, or when the basic training academy is no longer certified by the commission.

(5) When those firearms are returned, the law enforcement agency to which the firearms
 are returned, shall on the date of the return, enter into the Automated Firearms System (AFS), via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System, a complete description of each weapon, including the make, type, category, caliber, and serial number of the firearms, and the name of the entity returning the firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 698, Sec. 1.   (SB 759)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

34010.

Any law enforcement agency that retains custody of any firearm pursuant to Section 34005, or that destroys a firearm pursuant to Sections 18000 and 18005, shall notify the Department of Justice, and, if applicable, the superior court and any parties to any civil or criminal action related to the firearm, of the retention or destruction. This notification shall consist of a complete description of each firearm, including the name of the manufacturer or brand name, model, caliber, and serial number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 58, Sec. 37.   (AB 200)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 12. MISCELLANEOUS DUTIES OF THE DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE [34200. - 34400.]



  CHAPTER 1. Miscellaneous Reports and Publications [34200. - 34210.]

34200.

The Attorney General shall provide the Legislature on or before April 15 of each year, commencing in 1998, a written report on the specific types of firearms used in the commission of crimes based upon information obtained from state and local crime laboratories. The report shall include all of the following information regarding crimes in which firearms were used:

(a) A description of the relative occurrence of firearms most frequently used in the commission of violent crimes, distinguishing whether the firearms used were handguns, rifles, shotguns, assault weapons, or other related types of weapons.

(b) A description of specific types of firearms that
 are used in homicides or street gang and drug trafficking crimes.

(c) The frequency with which stolen firearms were used in the commission of the crimes.

(d) The frequency with which fully automatic firearms were used in the commission of the crimes.

(e) Any trends of importance such as those involving specialized ammunition or firearms modifications, such as conversion to a fully automatic weapon, removal of serial number, shortening of barrel, or use of a suppressor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

34205.

(a) The Department of Justice shall prepare a pamphlet that summarizes California firearms laws as they pertain to persons other than law enforcement officers or members of the armed services.

(b) The pamphlet shall include the following matters:

(1) Lawful possession.

(2) Licensing procedures.

(3) Transportation and use of firearms.

(4) Acquisition of hunting licenses.

(5) The
 safe handling and use of firearms.

(6) Various methods of safe storage and child proofing of firearms.

(7) The availability of firearms safety programs and devices.

(8) The responsibilities of firearms ownership.

(9) The operation of various types of firearms.

(10) The lawful use of deadly force.

(c) The department shall offer copies of the pamphlet at actual cost to firearms dealers licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, who shall have copies of the most current version available for sale to retail purchasers or transferees of firearms. The cost of the pamphlet, if any, may be added to the sale price of the
 firearm. Other interested parties may purchase copies directly from the Department of General Services.

(d) The pamphlet shall declare that it is merely intended to provide a general summary of laws applicable to firearms and is not designed to provide individual guidance for specific areas. Individuals having specific questions shall be directed to contact their local law enforcement agency or private counsel.

(e) The Department of Justice or any other public entity shall be immune from any liability arising from the drafting, publication, or dissemination of the pamphlet or any reliance upon it. All receipts from the sale of these pamphlets shall be deposited as reimbursements to the support appropriation for the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

34210.

(a) The Department of Justice shall prepare a pamphlet in all of the languages described in subdivision (a) of Section 31640 that explains the reasons for and risks of owning a firearm and bringing a firearm into the home, including the increased risk of death to someone in the household by suicide, homicide, or unintentional injury.

(b) The department may solicit input from any reputable association or organization in the development of the pamphlet.

(c) The department shall design and make available on its internet website the pamphlet described in subdivision (a) in PDF or another imaging format to firearms dealers licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, to
 distribute pursuant to Section 26866.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 248, Sec. 4.5.   (AB 1598)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Ballistics Identification System [34350. - 34370.]

34350.

(a) The Attorney General shall conduct a study to evaluate ballistics identification systems to determine the feasibility and potential benefits to law enforcement of utilizing a statewide ballistics identification system capable of maintaining a database of ballistic images and information from test fired and sold firearms. The study shall include an evaluation of ballistics identification systems currently used by state and federal law enforcement agencies and the firearms industry. The Attorney General shall consult with law enforcement agencies, firearms industry representatives, private technology providers, and other appropriate parties in conducting the study.

(b) In evaluating ballistics
 identification systems to determine the feasibility of utilizing a statewide system as required pursuant to subdivision (a), the Attorney General shall consider, at a minimum, the following:

(1) The development of methods by which firearm manufacturers, importers, and dealers may potentially capture ballistic images from firearms prior to sale in California and forward that information to the Attorney General.

(2) The development of methods by which the Attorney General will receive, store, and make available to law enforcement ballistic images submitted by firearm manufacturers, importers, and dealers prior to sale in California.

(3) The potential financial costs to the Attorney General of implementing and operating a statewide ballistics identification system, including the process for receipt of information from
 firearm manufacturers, importers, and dealers.

(4) The capability of a ballistics identification system maintaining a database of ballistic images and information from test fired firearms for all firearms sold in California.

(5) The compatibility of a ballistics identification system with ballistics identification systems that are currently used by law enforcement agencies in California.

(6) A method to ensure that state and local law enforcement agencies can forward ballistic identification information to the Attorney General for inclusion in a statewide ballistics identification system.

(7) The feasibility and potential benefits to law enforcement of requiring firearm manufacturers, importers, and dealers to provide the Attorney General with ballistic
 images from any, or a selected number of, test fired firearms prior to the sale of those firearms in California.

(c) The Attorney General shall submit a report to the Legislature with the results of the study not later than June 1, 2001. In the event the report includes a determination that a ballistics identification system and database is feasible and would benefit law enforcement, the report shall also recommend a strategy for implementation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

34355.

(a) Section 34350 does not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms made to an authorized law enforcement representative of any city, county, city and county, or state, or of the federal government, for exclusive use by that governmental agency if, prior to the sale, delivery, or transfer of these firearms, written authorization from the head of the agency authorizing the transaction is presented to the person from whom the purchase, delivery, or transfer is being made.

(b) Proper written authorization is defined as verifiable written certification from the head of the agency by which the purchaser or transferee is employed, identifying the employee as an individual authorized to conduct the transaction, and
 authorizing the transaction for the exclusive use of the agency by which that person is employed.

(c) Within 10 days of the date a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is acquired by the agency, a record of the same shall be entered as an institutional weapon into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 76.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

34360.

Section 34350 does not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The loan is made by an authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, or city and county, or of the state or federal government.

(b) The loan is made to a peace officer employed by that agency and authorized to carry a firearm.

(c) The loan is made for the carrying and use of that firearm by that peace officer in the course and scope of the officer’s duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

34365.

(a) Section 34350 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a peace officer pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code to that peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that sold, delivered, or
 transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 77.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

34370.

(a) Section 34350 does not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a retiring peace officer who is authorized to carry a firearm pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 26300) of Division 5.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred to that retiring peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that sold,
 delivered, or transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 78.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Firearm and Ammunition Excise Tax Certificates of Registration [34400. - 34400.]

34400.

(a) The department may revoke any ammunition vendor license or remove any firearms dealer or firearms manufacturer from any centralized list maintained by the department pursuant to Sections 26715, 28450, and 29060, upon notification from the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration that either of the following events has occurred:

(1) After providing notice and the opportunity for a hearing, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration has revoked the licensee’s certificate of registration, pursuant to Section 36037 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, for violating any of the provisions of Part 16 (commencing with Section 36001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) After providing notice and the opportunity for a hearing, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration has revoked or suspended the licensee’s seller’s permit, pursuant to Section 6070 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, for violating any of the provisions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) The Department of Justice may reinstate an ammunition vendor license that has been revoked pursuant to subdivision (a), or reinstate on any centralized list maintained by the department pursuant to Sections 26715, 28450, and 29060, a firearms dealer or manufacturer that was removed from the centralized list pursuant to subdivision (a) if the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration has reinstated the licensee’s certificate of registration or the seller’s permit, as applicable.

(c) The Department of Justice’s authority under this section to revoke or reinstate an ammunition vendor license, or to remove or reinstate a firearms dealer or firearms manufacturer from a centralized list shall be in addition to the Department of Justice’s authority to revoke or reinstate an ammunition vendor license or to remove or reinstate a firearms dealer or firearms manufacturer from a centralized list under any other statute or authority.

(d) The Department of Justice may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations, including emergency regulations as necessary, relating to the administration and enforcement of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 231, Sec. 6.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

